Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1905
Specimens; chain of custody.

Except for breath test specimens as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 48-1903, a written record of the chain of custody of the specimen shall be maintained from the time of the collection of the specimen until the specimen is no longer required.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 5.